src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k35_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    bonkur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bonkur
    bonkur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: bonk
    bonkur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: [beinki, bonki]
    bonkur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: [beinkjar, bonkar]
    bonkur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: beinkir
    bonkur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: beinkir
    bonkur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: beinkjum
    bonkur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: beinkja
    bonkur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: bonkurin
    bonkur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: [beinkin, bonkin]
    bonkur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [beinkinum, bonkinum]
    bonkur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: [beinkjarins, bonkarins]
    bonkur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: beinkirnir
    bonkur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: beinkirnar
    bonkur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: beinkjunum
    bonkur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: beinkjanna
